test/src/morphology/N-paivy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - päivy: # Noun 'day / päivä' - full paradigm
     päivy+N+Sg+Nom: päivy
     päivy+N+Sg+Gen: päivän
     päivy+N+Sg+Acc: [päivy, päivän]
     päivy+N+Sg+Par: päiviä
     päivy+N+Sg+Tra: päiväkse
     päivy+N+Sg+Abe: [päivättä, päivätä, päivättäh]
     päivy+N+Sg+Com: päivänke
     päivy+N+Sg+Ine: päiväs
     päivy+N+Sg+Ela: [päiväspäi, päiväs]
     päivy+N+Sg+Ill: päiväh
     päivy+N+Sg+Ade: päiväl
     päivy+N+Sg+Abl: [päivälpäi, päiväl]
     päivy+N+Sg+All: päiväle
     päivy+N+Sg+Ess: päivänny
     päivy+N+Sg+Ter: päivässäh
     päivy+N+Sg+Apr: päivällyö
     päivy+N+Pl+Nom: päivät
     päivy+N+Pl+Gen: päivien
     päivy+N+Pl+Acc: päivät
     päivy+N+Pl+Par: päivii
     päivy+N+Pl+Tra: päivikse
     päivy+N+Pl+Abe: [päivittä, päivitä, päivittäh]
     päivy+N+Pl+Com: päivienke
     päivy+N+Pl+Ine: päivis
     päivy+N+Pl+Ela: [päivispäi, päivis]
     päivy+N+Pl+Ill: päivih
     päivy+N+Pl+Ade: päivil
     päivy+N+Pl+Abl: [päivilpäi, päivil]
     päivy+N+Pl+All: päivile
     päivy+N+Pl+Ess: päivinny
     päivy+N+Pl+Ins: päivin
     päivy+N+Pl+Apr: päiviellyö
     päivy+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: päivygi
     päivy+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: päivängi
     päivy+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [päivygi, päivängi]
     päivy+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: päiviägi
     päivy+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: päiväksegi
     päivy+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [päivättägi, päivätägi, päivättähgi]
     päivy+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: päivänkegi
     päivy+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: päiväsgi
     päivy+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [päiväspäigi, päiväsgi]
     päivy+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: päivähgi
     päivy+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: päivälgi
     päivy+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [päivälpäigi, päivälgi]
     päivy+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: päivälegi
     päivy+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: päivännygi
     päivy+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: päivässähgi
     päivy+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: päivällyögi
     päivy+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: päivätgi
     päivy+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: päiviengi
     päivy+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: päivätgi
     päivy+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: päiviigi
     päivy+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: päiviksegi
     päivy+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [päivitägi, päivittägi, päivittähgi]
     päivy+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: päivienkegi
     päivy+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: päivisgi
     päivy+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [päivispäigi, päivisgi]
     päivy+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: päivihgi
     päivy+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: päivilgi
     päivy+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [päivilpäigi, päivilgi]
     päivy+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: päivilegi
     päivy+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: päivinnygi
     päivy+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: päivingi
     päivy+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: päiviellyögi
